src/fst/affixes/verbs.lexc
LEXICON v3_kaya  !!≈ @CODE@ käyä:kä from fkv
+V+Inf:y%>^A KK ; ! 
+V+Act+Ind+Prs:y^WG v12pers_short ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3:y%>pi K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3:y%>pii K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3:y%>vä K ; ! 
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3:y%>hään K ; !GEO!
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ConNeg:y K ;

+V+Act+Ind+Prt:v%>i3^WG v12pers_short ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3:v%>i3t K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3:v%>i3v^A K ; 
+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3+Err/Orth:v%>i3v^At K ; 
+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3:y%>thiin K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3:v%>i3 K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ConNeg+Sg:y%>^N^U K ;

+V+Inf+Tra:y%>^Akse PxK ; ! 
+V+Inf+Err/Orth:y%>d^A K ; ! d
+V+InfE+Ine:y%>ess^A K ; 
+V+InfE+Ins:y%>en K ; 

+V+Pass+Ind+Prs:y%>thään K ; ! 
+V+Pass+Ind+Prs:y%>hään K ; ! 
+V+Pass+Ind+Prt:y%>thiin K ; 

+V+Act+PrsPrc:yv%>^A x3 ;
+V+Pass+PrsPrc:y%>t^A%>v^A x3 ;
+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom:y%>^N^U K ;
+V+Act+PrfPrc+Pl+Nom:y%>^Nheet K ;
+V+Act+PrfPrc+Pl+Nom:y%>^N^HMET2%>heet K ;
!+V+Act+PrfPrc:yn%> PRFPRC_OBL  ;
+V+Pass+PrfPrc+Pl+Nom:y’%>^U%>t K ; 
+V+Pass+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom:y%>t^U K ;

+V+Act+Cond:v%>i4s 2cond ;
+V+Act+Cond+Sg3:v%>i4si K ;
!+V+Act+Cond+Pl1:v%>i4s%>im^A K ;
+V+Pass+Cond:y%>t^A%>i4s K ;
+V+Pass+Cond:y%>t^A%>s K ;

+V+Act+Imprt+Sg2:y K   ;
+V+Act+Imprt+Pl2:y%>kk^A^A K ;

+V+InfMa+Ine:y%>m^Ass^A K ;
+V+InfMa+Ela:y%>m^Ast^A K ;
+V+InfMa+Ill:y%>mh^A^An K ;
+V+InfMa+Ill:ym^HMET2%>h^A^An K ; ! also hm
+V+InfMa+Ade:y%>m^Al^A K ;
+V+InfMa+Abe:y%>m^Att^A K ;
!+V+InfMa:y%>m^A MATONodd ;


+V+Der+Der/minen+N:ymi xnen ;


LEXICON v3_nahha !!≈ @CODE@ nähä:nä = from fkv
+V+Inf:h%>h^A KK ; ! 
+V+Inf:%>h^A KK ; ! 
+V+Act+Ind+Prs:e^WG v12pers_short ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Err/Orth:je^WG v12pers_short ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3:kke%>e K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3:h%>h^A^An K ; ! 
+V+Pass+Ind+Prs:h%>h^A^An K ; ! 

+V+Act+Ind+Prt:%>i^WG v12pers_short ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Err/Orth:%>ji^WG v12pers_short ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3:k%>i K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3:%>i3t K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3:%>ki3v^A K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3+Err/Orth:%>ki3v^At K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3:h%>thiin K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ConNeg+Sg:h%>^N^U K ;
+V+Pass+Ind+Prt:h%>thiin K ;

+V+Act+Cond:%>ki4s 2cond ;
!+V+Act+Cond+Pl1:%>ki4s%>imm^A K ; !tillfälligt bort
!+V+Act+Cond+Pl3:%>htäi4s K ; !CHECK!
+V+Pass+Cond:%>htäis K ;
+V+Inf+Tra:h%>h^Akse PxK ; ! 
+V+Inf+Err/Orth:h%>h^A K ; ! 
+V+InfE+Ins:h%>hen K ;
+V+InfE+Ine:h%>hess^A K ;

+V+InfMa+Ine:ke%>m^Ass^A K ;
+V+InfMa+Ela:ke%>m^Ast^A K ;
+V+InfMa+Ill:ke%>mh^A^An K ;
+V+InfMa+Ill:ke%>%^HMET2mh^A^An K ;
+V+InfMa+Ade:ke%>m^All^A K ;
+V+InfMa+Abe:ke%>m^Att^A K ;
!+V+Act+InfMa:ke%>m^A MATONodd ;

+V+Act+PrsPrc:kkee%>v^A x3 ;
+V+Pass+PrsPrc:%>ht^A%>v^A x3 ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ConNeg:e K ;

+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom:h%>^N^U K ;
+V+Pass+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom:h%>t^U K ;
+V+Pass+PrfPrc+Pl+Nom:h%>n^U%>t K ;
!+V+Act+PrfPrc:h%>^Nhee PRFPRC_OBL ;
+V+Act+PrfPrc:h%>^N PRFPRC_OBL ;
+V+Act+PrfPrc+Pl+Nom:h%>^Neet K ; 

+V+Act+Imprt+Sg2:je K   ;
+V+Act+Imprt+Pl2:h%>k^A^A K ;
+V+Act+Imprt+Pl2:h%>k^A^As K ;

+V+Der+Der/minen+N:kke xnen ;


LEXICON v3_tehha !!≈ @CODE@ tehä:te from fkv
+V+Inf:h%>h^A KK ; ! xxx
+V+Inf:h%>^A KK ;  ! xxx 

+V+Act+Ind+Prs:he v12pers_short ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3:kke%>e K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3:k%>ev^A K ; 
+V+Pass+Ind+Prs:h%>h^A^An K ; ! 
+V+Pass+Ind+Prs:ht%>h^A^An K ; ! 
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ConNeg:he K ;

+V+Act+Ind+Prt:%>hi v12pers_short ; !tehin, tehit ... tehimä, tehittä ...
+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3:k%>i K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3:h%>i3t K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3:%>ki3v^A K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3+Err/Orth:%>ki3v^At K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3:h%>thiin K ;
+V+Pass+Ind+Prt:h%>thiin K ;
+V+Act+Inf+Prt+ConNeg+Sg:h%>^n^U K ;

+V+Act+Cond:k%>i4s 2cond ;
+V+Act+Cond+Pl1:k%>i4s%>imm^A K ;
+V+Act+Cond+Pl3:k%>i4s%>it K ;
!+V+Act+Cond+Pl3:k%>i4s%>iv^A K ; !TILLF borta
+V+Pass+Cond:htä%>i4s K ;
+V+Pass+Cond:htä%>s K ;

+V+Act+PrsPrc:ke%>v^A x3 ;
+V+Pass+PrsPrc:h%>t^A%>v^A x3 ;

+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom:h%>^n^U K ;
+V+Act+PrfPrc+Pl+Nom:h%>neet K ; 
!+V+Act+PrfPrc:h%>nee PRFPRC_OBL ;
+V+Pass+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom:h%>t^U K ;
!+V+Pass+PrfPrc:h%>y PRFPRC_OBL ;
+V+Pass+PrfPrc+Pl+Nom:h%>yt K ; 

+V+Inf+Tra:h%>h^Akse PxK ; ! 
+V+Inf+Err/Orth:h%>d^ K ; ! d
+V+InfE+Ins:%>hen K ;
+V+InfE+Ine:%>hess^A K ;
+V+InfMa+Ine:ke%>m^Ass^A K ;
+V+InfMa+Ela:ke%>m^Ast^A K ;
+V+InfMa+Ill:ke%>mh^A^An K ;
+V+InfMa+Ill:ke%>%^HMET2mh^A^An K ;
+V+InfMa+Ill:k%>heen K ;
+V+InfMa+Ade:ke%>m^All^A K ;
+V+InfMa+Abe:ke%>m^Att^A K ;
!+V+Act+InfMa:ke%>m^A MATONodd ;

+V+Act+Imprt+Sg2:he K   ;
+V+Act+Imprt+Pl2:h%>k^A^A K ;

+V+Der+Der/minen+N:kke xnen ;



LEXICON v4  !!≈ * **@CODE@**
+V+Inf:%>^N^A KK ;
+V+Inf+Tra:%>^N^Akse PxK ;
+V+InfE+Ins:%>^Nen K ; !tullen
+V+InfE+Ine:%>^Ness^A K ; !tullessa, mennässä MEN noustessa ACT
+V+InfE+Ine:%>t^Ae%>ss^A K ; !CHECK! PASS
+V+InfMa+Ill:e%>^HMETAmh^A^An K ; 
+V+InfMa+Ill:e%>%^HMET2mh^A^An K ;
+V+InfMa+Ill:%>heen K ; !tulheen 
+V+InfMa+Ine:e%>m^Ass^A K ;
+V+InfMa+Ela:e%>m^Ast^A K ;
+V+InfMa+Ade:e%>m^All^A K ; 
+V+InfMa+Abe:e%>m^Att^A K ;

+V+Pass+Ind+Prs:%^HMET2%>h^A^An K ; 
+V+Pass+Ind+Prs:%>h^A^An K ;
+V+Pass+Ind+Prt:%>thiin K ;
+V+Pass+Ind+Prs+ConNeg:%>%^N^A K ;
+V+Pass+Ind+Prt+ConNeg:%>t^U K ;

+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom:%>^N^U K ; !noussu! menny etc
+V+Pass+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom:%>t^U K ;
+V+Act+PrfPrc+Pl+Nom:%>heet PxK ;
+V+Act+PrfPrc+Pl+Nom:%^HMET2%>heet PxK ; 
!+V+Pass+PrfPrc:%>t^U x3_oblique ;
+V+Pass+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom:%>t^U K ; !noustu, menty 
+V+Pass+PrfPrc+Pl+Nom:%>t^U%>t K ;

+V+Act+PrsPrc:e%>v^A x3 ;
+V+Pass+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom:%>t^Av^A K ;
+V+Pass+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom:%>t^Av^At K ;

+V+Pass+Cond:%>i4s K ;

+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ConNeg:e K ;
+V+Act+Imprt+Sg2:e # ;
+V+Act+Imprt+Sg:%>kh^O^On # ;
+V+Act+Imprt+Pl2:%>kh^A^A # ;
+V+Act+Imprt+Pl2:%>k^A^A # ;
+V+Act+Imprt+Pl3:%>kh^O^Ot # ;

+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg1:e%>n K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg2:e%>t K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3:e%>e K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl1:e%>m^A K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl2:e%>tt^A K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3:e%>v^A K ; ! K&P p. 95.  without -t
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3+Err/Orth:e%>v^At K ; ! K&P p. 95.  without -t

+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1:%>i3n K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg2:%>i3t K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3:%>i3 K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl1:%>i3m^A K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl2:%>i3tt^A K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3:%>i3t K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3:%>iv^A K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3+Err/Orth:%>thiin K ; !CHECK GEO
+V+Act+Cond:%>i4s 2cond ;
+V+Act+Cond+Pl1:%>i4s%>imm^A K ;
+V+Act+Cond+Pl3:%>i4s%>it K ;
+V+Act+Cond+Pl3:%>i4s%>iv^A K ;

+V+Der+Der/minen+N:emi xnen ;

LEXICON v4_julkasta  !!≈ * **@CODE@**
+V+Inf:%>^N^A KK ;
+V+Inf+Tra:%>^N^Akse PxK ;
+V+InfE+Ins:ten K ;
+V+InfE+Ine:te%>ss^A K ; !CHECK! ACT
+V+InfE+Ine:tae%>ss^A K ; !CHECK! PASS
!+V+InfMa:e 3infcase ;
+V+InfMa+Ill:e%>^HMETAmh^A^An K ; ! 
+V+InfMa+Ill:e%>%^HMET2mh^A^An K ;
+V+InfMa+Ine:e%>m^Ass^A K ;
+V+InfMa+Ela:e%>m^Ast^A K ;
+V+InfMa+Ade:e%>m^All^A K ; 
+V+InfMa+Abe:e%>m^Att^A K ;


+V+Pass+Ind+Prs:%>th^A^An K ;
+V+Pass+Ind+Prt:%>thiin K ;
+V+Pass+Ind+Prs+ConNeg:%>%^N^A K ;
+V+Pass+Ind+Prt+ConNeg:%>t^U K ;

+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom:%>s^U K ;
!+V+Pass+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom:%>t^U K ;
+V+Act+PrfPrc:%>hee x3_obli ;
!+V+Pass+PrfPrc:%>t^U x3_oblique ;
+V+Pass+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom:%>t^U K ; !julkassu
+V+Pass+PrfPrc+Pl+Nom:%>t^U%>t K ;

+V+Act+PrsPrc:e%>v^A x3 ;
+V+Pass+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom:%>t^Av^A K ;
+V+Pass+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom:%>t^Av^At K ;

+V+Pass+Cond:%>i4s K ;

+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ConNeg:e K ;
+V+Act+Imprt+Sg2:e # ;
+V+Act+Imprt+Sg:%>kh^O^On # ;
+V+Act+Imprt+Pl2:%>kh^A^A # ;
+V+Act+Imprt+Pl3:%>kh^O^Ot # ;

+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg1:e%>n K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg2:e%>t K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3:e%>e K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl1:e%>mm^A K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl2:e%>tt^A K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3:e%>v^A K ; ! K&P p. 95.  without -t
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3+Err/Orth:e%>v^At K ; ! K&P p. 95.  without -t

+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1:%>i3n K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg2:%>i3t K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3:%>i3 K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl1:%>i3mm^A K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl2:%>i3tt^A K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3:%>i3t K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3:%>iv^A K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3+Err/Orth:%>thiin K ; !CHECK! GEO

+V+Act+Cond:%>i4s 2cond ;
+V+Act+Cond+Pl1:%>i4s%>imm^A K ;
+V+Act+Cond+Pl3:%>i4s%>it K ;
+V+Act+Cond+Pl3:%>i4s%>iv^A K ;

+V+Der+Der/minen+N:emi xnen ;
